Illinois, session 104th, HB1257.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 138.1)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the Workers' Compensation 8Act. 9    (a) The term "employer" as used in this Act means:10    1. The State and each county, city, town, township, 11incorporated village, school district, body politic, or 12municipal corporation therein.13    2. Every person, firm, public or private corporation, 14including hospitals, public service, eleemosynary, religious 15or charitable corporations or associations who has any person 16in service or under any contract for hire, express or implied, 17oral or written, and who is engaged in any of the enterprises 18or businesses enumerated in Section 3 of this Act, or who at or 19prior to the time of the accident to the employee for which 20compensation under this Act may be claimed, has in the manner 21provided in this Act elected to become subject to the 22provisions of this Act, and who has not, prior to such 23accident, effected a withdrawal of such election in the manner   HB1257- 2 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1provided in this Act.2    3. Any one engaging in any business or enterprise referred 3to in subsections 1 and 2 of Section 3 of this Act who 4undertakes to do any work enumerated therein, is liable to pay 5compensation to his own immediate employees in accordance with 6the provisions of this Act, and in addition thereto if he 7directly or indirectly engages any contractor whether 8principal or sub-contractor to do any such work, he is liable 9to pay compensation to the employees of any such contractor or 10sub-contractor unless such contractor or sub-contractor has 11insured, in any company or association authorized under the 12laws of this State to insure the liability to pay compensation 13under this Act, or guaranteed his liability to pay such 14compensation. With respect to any time limitation on the 15filing of claims provided by this Act, the timely filing of a 16claim against a contractor or subcontractor, as the case may 17be, shall be deemed to be a timely filing with respect to all 18persons upon whom liability is imposed by this paragraph.19    In the event any such person pays compensation under this 20subsection he may recover the amount thereof from the 21contractor or sub-contractor, if any, and in the event the 22contractor pays compensation under this subsection he may 23recover the amount thereof from the sub-contractor, if any.24    This subsection does not apply in any case where the 25accident occurs elsewhere than on, in or about the immediate 26premises on which the principal has contracted that the work   HB1257- 3 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1be done.2    4. Where an employer operating under and subject to the 3provisions of this Act loans an employee to another such 4employer and such loaned employee sustains a compensable 5accidental injury in the employment of such borrowing employer 6and where such borrowing employer does not provide or pay the 7benefits or payments due such injured employee, such loaning 8employer is liable to provide or pay all benefits or payments 9due such employee under this Act and as to such employee the 10liability of such loaning and borrowing employers is joint and 11several, provided that such loaning employer is in the absence 12of agreement to the contrary entitled to receive from such 13borrowing employer full reimbursement for all sums paid or 14incurred pursuant to this paragraph together with reasonable 15attorneys' fees and expenses in any hearings before the 16Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission or in any action to 17secure such reimbursement. Where any benefit is provided or 18paid by such loaning employer the employee has the duty of 19rendering reasonable cooperation in any hearings, trials or 20proceedings in the case, including such proceedings for 21reimbursement.22    Where an employee files an Application for Adjustment of 23Claim with the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission 24alleging that his claim is covered by the provisions of the 25preceding paragraph, and joining both the alleged loaning and 26borrowing employers, they and each of them, upon written   HB1257- 4 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1demand by the employee and within 7 days after receipt of such 2demand, shall have the duty of filing with the Illinois 3Workers' Compensation Commission a written admission or denial 4of the allegation that the claim is covered by the provisions 5of the preceding paragraph and in default of such filing or if 6any such denial be ultimately determined not to have been bona 7fide then the provisions of Paragraph K of Section 19 of this 8Act shall apply.9    An employer whose business or enterprise or a substantial 10part thereof consists of hiring, procuring or furnishing 11employees to or for other employers operating under and 12subject to the provisions of this Act for the performance of 13the work of such other employers and who pays such employees 14their salary or wages notwithstanding that they are doing the 15work of such other employers shall be deemed a loaning 16employer within the meaning and provisions of this Section.17    (b) The term "employee" as used in this Act means:18    1. Every person in the service of the State, including 19members of the General Assembly, members of the Commerce 20Commission, members of the Illinois Workers' Compensation 21Commission, and all persons in the service of the University 22of Illinois, county, including deputy sheriffs and assistant 23state's attorneys, city, town, township, incorporated village 24or school district, body politic, or municipal corporation 25therein, whether by election, under appointment or contract of 26hire, express or implied, oral or written, including all   HB1257- 5 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1members of the Illinois National Guard while on active duty in 2the service of the State, and all probation personnel of the 3Juvenile Court appointed pursuant to Article VI of the 4Juvenile Court Act of 1987, and including any official of the 5State, any county, city, town, township, incorporated village, 6school district, body politic or municipal corporation therein 7except any duly appointed member of a police department in any 8city whose population exceeds 500,000 according to the last 9Federal or State census, and except any member of a fire 10insurance patrol maintained by a board of underwriters in this 11State. A duly appointed member of a fire department in any 12city, the population of which exceeds 500,000 according to the 13last federal or State census, is an employee under this Act 14only with respect to claims brought under paragraph (c) of 15Section 8.16    One employed by a contractor who has contracted with the 17State, or a county, city, town, township, incorporated 18village, school district, body politic or municipal 19corporation therein, through its representatives, is not 20considered as an employee of the State, county, city, town, 21township, incorporated village, school district, body politic 22or municipal corporation which made the contract.23    2. Every person in the service of another under any 24contract of hire, express or implied, oral or written, 25including persons whose employment is outside of the State of 26Illinois where the contract of hire is made within the State of   HB1257- 6 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1Illinois, persons whose employment results in fatal or 2non-fatal injuries within the State of Illinois where the 3contract of hire is made outside of the State of Illinois, and 4persons whose employment is principally localized within the 5State of Illinois, regardless of the place of the accident or 6the place where the contract of hire was made, and including 7noncitizens, and minors who, for the purpose of this Act are 8considered the same and have the same power to contract, 9receive payments and give quittances therefor, as adult 10employees.11    3. Every sole proprietor and every partner of a business 12may elect to be covered by this Act.13    An employee or his dependents under this Act who shall 14have a cause of action by reason of any injury, disablement or 15death arising out of and in the course of his employment may 16elect to pursue his remedy in the State where injured or 17disabled, or in the State where the contract of hire is made, 18or in the State where the employment is principally localized.19    However, any employer may elect to provide and pay 20compensation to any employee other than those engaged in the 21usual course of the trade, business, profession or occupation 22of the employer by complying with Sections 2 and 4 of this Act. 23Employees are not included within the provisions of this Act 24when excluded by the laws of the United States relating to 25liability of employers to their employees for personal 26injuries where such laws are held to be exclusive.  HB1257- 7 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1    The term "employee" does not include persons performing 2services as real estate broker, broker-salesman, or salesman 3when such persons are paid by commission only.4    (c) "Commission" means the Industrial Commission created 5by Section 5 of "The Civil Administrative Code of Illinois", 6approved March 7, 1917, as amended, or the Illinois Workers' 7Compensation Commission created by Section 13 of this Act.8    (d) To obtain compensation under this Act, an employee 9bears the burden of showing, by a preponderance of the 10evidence, that he or she has sustained accidental injuries 11arising out of and in the course of the employment. 12    Except as provided in subsection (e), accidental injuries 13sustained while traveling to or from work do not arise out of 14and in the course of employment. 15    (e) An accidental injury arises out of and in the course of 16employment if it is sustained by an employee who is required by 17the employer to travel away from the employer's premises in 18order to perform his or her job and the conduct in which the 19employee was engaged at the time of the accidental injury was: 20(1) acts the employer instructed the employee to perform; (2) 21acts that the employee had a common law or statutory duty to 22perform while performing duties for his or her employer; or 23(3) acts that the employee might be reasonably expected to 24perform incident to his or her assigned duties.25    Notwithstanding the foregoing, an accidental injury 26sustained by an employee while traveling away from the   HB1257- 8 -LRB104 03224 SPS 13246 b1employer's premises does not arise out of and in the course of 2employment if: (1) the accidental injury is sustained during 3the employee's commute to and from his or her domicile, 4residence, or place where the employee currently lives and his 5or her primary or current place of employment; (2) the 6accidental injury is sustained during a personal deviation or 7personal errand; or (3) the accidental injury, or the medical 8condition or impairment for which compensation is sought, 9resulted from a personal risk.10    In determining whether an employee is required to travel 11away from the employer's premises in order to perform his or 12her job, the following factors, shall be considered: 13        (1) whether the employee's course or method of travel 14    was determined by the demands and exigencies of the job;15        (2) whether the employer reimbursed the employee for 16    travel expenses or time spent traveling; and17        (3) whether the employer directed the employee's 18    travel or required the employee to take a certain route to 19    perform his or her duties. 20(Source: P.A. 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.